Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.260

Sewerage lien foreclosure—Redemption.

All sales shall be subject to the right of redemption within one year from date of sale.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.260. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-10, part.]